seminars/FOMA/example.foma
define Vowel a | i | u;
define Stop p | t | k;
define Fricative f | s | h;
define Consonant Stop | Fricative;
define Input Vowel* [Consonant Vowel+]+;

define A Vowel -> u || Fricative _ u;
define B Vowel -> u || Stop _ u;
define AoB A .o. B;
define Exception h a u -> h u a || _;
define EPAoB E .P. B;

define GrammarRegular = Input .o. AoB;
define GrammarException = Input .o. EPAoB;
